Tennessee, session 114, SB1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-140-319(a)(1)(C), is amended by
deleting the language "five (5) business days" wherever it may appear and substituting "three
(3) business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1380
001077
- 1 -